Missouri, session 2026, HB2844.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 281, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 281.130, to read as follows:
281.130. 1. This section shall be known as and may be cited as the "Paraquat
Ban and Environmental Research Act of 2026".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of agriculture;
(2) "Paraquat", any herbicide product containing paraquat dichloride or any
other chemical form of paraquat;
(3) "Person", any individual, firm, entity, partnership, exchange, association,
trustee, receiver, corporation or any other business organization, and any member,
officer, or employee thereof;
(4) "Use", the application, distribution, sale, or handling of paraquat within this
state.
3. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, except as provided under subdivision (2) of
this subsection, the use of paraquat is prohibited in this state.
(2) The department of agriculture, in consultation with the department of
natural resources, may, by rule, allow the limited use of paraquat for research purposes
only when such research is conducted under strict safety and reporting protocols
established by the department of agriculture.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2844 2
4. (1) Before January 1, 2027, all persons that currently use, distribute, or sell
paraquat in this state shall submit a detailed report or reports to the department
including, but not limited to, the:
(a) Quantity of paraquat used, sold, or distributed in the preceding year;
(b) Geographic areas where paraquat is used;
(c) Types of crops or applications for which paraquat is used; and
(d) Any other information that the department shall require by rule or
regulation.
(2) The department shall compile and publish these reports, including the
publication of a statewide paraquat use report, including usage by county and by type of
crop, on the department's internet website that is accessible to the public and the
legislature. The department shall publish such reports within a reasonable time but no
later than March 31, 2027, and every year thereafter.
5. Any person who violates the provisions of subsection 3 of this section shall be
subject to a fine or penalty in the amount of two hundred fifty dollars for the first
violation and no more than five hundred dollars for each subsequent violation. The
department shall determine the method and procedure for collecting the fines for any
violation or violations committed by a person including, but not limited to, any
enforcement action that is warranted against the person. The department may
coordinate with the attorney general's office as needed to enforce the provisions of
subsection 3 of this section.
6. The department shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section including, but not limited to, fines and penalties. Any rule
or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
invalid and void.
✔